Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-824
Existing condominium property regimes; amendments to Condominium Property Act; effect.

Existing condominium property regimes, by approval of the co-owners, may choose to adopt, in whole or in part, amendments to the Condominium Property Act when effective or may choose to continue in existence pursuant to the terms of the act in effect on the date of filing of the master deed.

Laws 1974, LB 730, § 14.

Condominium Property Act, see section 76-801.